Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-628
Community correctional
programming; condition of probation.

(1) A sentencing
judge may sentence an offender to probation conditioned upon community correctional
programming.

(2) A sentence to a community correctional program or facility
shall be imposed as a condition of probation pursuant to the Nebraska Probation
Administration Act. The court may modify the sentence of an offender serving
a sentence in a community correctional program in the same manner as if the
offender had been placed on probation.

(3) The Office of Probation Administration shall utilize
community correctional facilities and programs as appropriate.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 40;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 11.

Nebraska Probation Administration Act, see section 29-2269.